PrefixAgr.lexc
LEXICON PrefixAgr
1sg:%{NO%-%} Prefixtag ;
2sg:%{PI%-%} Prefixtag ;
3sg.f:%{RI%-%} Prefixtag ;
3sg.m:%{RU%-%} Prefixtag ;
1pl:%{AW%-%} Prefixtag ;
2/3pl:i- Prefixtag ;
        
LEXICON Prefixtag
@U.PREFIX.YES@ Prefixfunction ;

LEXICON Prefixfunction
.poss-:0 Nountag ;
.subj-:0 Verbtag ;

LEXICON Nountag
@U.POLARITY.NO@ Nounclasses ;

LEXICON Verbtag
@U.POLARITY.YES@ Preverbclasses ;
